Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 20 Southern Dairy Compact

Cross references.

Department of Agriculture, T. 2, C. 2.

Milk and milk products, T. 26, C. 2, A. 7.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1 was redesignated as Chapter 19 and the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1249, § 1 was redesignated as Chapter 20.

2-20-1 through 2-20-5.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 1249, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 3-1/HB 553, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 3-1/HB 553 repealed and reserved this chapter, effective July 1, 2019.